Vermont statutes. Title 30 Public Service
Chapter 81. Electric Cooperatives
§ 3034.
Mortgages, filing.

A mortgage, deed of trust, or other instrument executed by a cooperative or foreign corporation doing business in this State pursuant to this chapter, which affects real and personal property and which is recorded in the town in which such property is located or is to be located, shall have the same force and effect as if the mortgage, deed of trust, or other instrument were also recorded, filed, or indexed as provided by law in the proper office in such town as a mortgage of personal property.
All after-acquired property of such cooperative or foreign corporation described or referred to as being mortgaged or pledged in such mortgage, deed of trust, or other instrument, shall become subject to the lien thereof immediately upon the acquisition of such property by such cooperative or foreign corporation, whether or not such property was in existence at the time of the execution of such mortgage, deed of trust, or other instrument.
Recordation of such mortgage, deed of trust, or other instrument shall constitute notice and otherwise have the same effect with respect to such after-acquired property as it has under the laws relating to recordation, with respect to property owned by such cooperative or foreign corporation at the time of the execution of such mortgage, deed of trust, or other instrument and therein described or referred to as being mortgaged or pledged thereby.

§ 3035.
Safety standards.

As a minimum requirement for any activity authorized by this chapter, the cooperative shall adhere to all applicable federal, State, or local safety codes, regulations, or standards.

HISTORY:

Amended

1999, No. 143

(Adj. Sess.), § 23.

§ 3036.
Acknowledgments, members authorized.

A person who is authorized to take acknowledgments under the laws of this State shall not be disqualified from taking acknowledgments of instruments executed in favor of a cooperative or to which it is a party, by reason of being an officer, director, or member of such cooperative.

HISTORY:

Amended

1999, No. 143

(Adj. Sess.), § 24.

§ 3037.
Foreign companies, service of process.

A foreign nonprofit or cooperative corporation supplying or authorized to supply electric energy and owning or operating electric transmission or distribution lines in an adjacent state, prior to March 26, 1943, may construct or acquire extensions of such lines in this State within an area no point of which is more than 25 miles from the boundary line of this State and may operate such extensions without qualifying as a foreign corporation to do business in this State.
Before constructing or operating such extensions, by an instrument executed and acknowledged on its behalf by its president or vice president, under its seal attested by its clerk or secretary, and filed with the Secretary of State, which instrument shall be in form and substance like that prescribed by

11 V.S.A. § 692

, such a corporation shall designate the Secretary of State its agent to accept service of process on its behalf.
Thereafter, such corporation shall have all the rights, powers, privileges, and immunities of a cooperative. Service of process shall be made upon the Secretary of State in accordance with the provisions of

12 V.S.A. §§ 851

and 852 and he or she shall forthwith forward one copy of the same by registered mail to such corporation at the address of its principal office.

§ 3038.
Fees.

There shall be paid to the Secretary of State fees for filing as follows:

Articles of incorporation, $15.00;

Articles of amendment, $10.00;

Articles of consolidation or merger, $15.00;

Articles of conversion, $10.00;

Certificate of election to dissolve, $5.00;

Articles of dissolution, $5.00; and

Certificate of change of principal office, $5.00.

Such fees shall include two certified copies of the respective instruments.

HISTORY:

Amended

1963, No. 37

, § 19.

§§ 3039,
3040.
Repealed.
1969, No. 257 (Adj. Sess.), § 7.

§ 3041.
Securities act.

The provisions of 9 V.S.A. chapter 131 shall not apply to a note, bond, or other evidence of indebtedness issued by a cooperative or foreign corporation doing business in this State pursuant to this chapter, to the United States of America or an agency or instrumentality thereof, or to a mortgage, deed of trust, or other instrument executed to secure the same.
The provisions of 9 V.S.A. chapter 131 shall not apply to the issuance of membership certificates by a cooperative or such foreign corporations.

§ 3042.
Annual reports.

Each cooperative formed under the provisions of this chapter shall prepare and submit to its annual meeting a report containing the name of the cooperative, its principal place of business, a general statement of its business operations during the fiscal year, including a statement of its assets and liabilities, the amount of its indebtedness secured by mortgage or pledge of the corporate property or part thereof, and the names of the directors, officers, and secretary. A copy of the annual report attested by the secretary shall be filed with the Secretary of State within 30 days after the annual meeting.

HISTORY:

Amended

1999, No. 143

(Adj. Sess.), § 25.

§ 3043.
Formation of cooperatives by cooperatives.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, one or more cooperatives formed under the provisions of this chapter may organize and control a cooperative having as its principal purpose the generation, manufacture, purchase, acquisition, accumulation, transmission, sale, supply, and disposal of energy, cable television, telecommunications, interactive media, and Internet access. Such a cooperative shall have all of the powers of cooperatives formed under the provisions of this chapter.

Members of a cooperative organized pursuant to subsection (a) of this section shall be the cooperative or cooperatives organizing it and may include any individual, partnership, association, corporation, municipality, or cooperative engaged in the generation, transmission, or distribution of energy within or without the State of Vermont. The bylaws of a cooperative organized pursuant to subsection (a) of this section may provide for more than one class of membership, including a class or classes with no rights or with limited rights to vote on matters requiring the vote of members under this chapter, and including a class or classes with no rights or limited rights to receive distributions of patronage refunds.

HISTORY:

Added

1979, No. 51

, § 1, eff. April 25, 1979; amended

1999, No. 143

(Adj. Sess.), § 26.

§ 3044.
Approval by members of cooperative.

With respect to matters not subject to section 248 of this title, a cooperative established under this chapter shall obtain the approval of the voters of the cooperative before in any way:

purchasing electric capacity or energy from outside the State:

for a period exceeding five years, that represents more than three percent of its historic peak demand, unless the purchase is from a plant that produces electricity from renewable energy; or

for a period exceeding 10 years, that represents more than 10 percent of its historic peak demand, if the purchase is from a plant that produces electricity from renewable energy;

investing in an electric generation or transmission facility located outside this State; or

beginning site preparation for or construction of an electric generation facility within the State, or an electric transmission facility within the State that is designed for immediate or eventual operation at any voltage or exercising the right of eminent domain in connection with site preparation for or construction of any such transmission or generation facility, except for the replacement of existing facilities with equivalent facilities in the usual course of business.

A cooperative shall obtain the approval required by subsection (a) of this section by a vote of a majority of the voters of the cooperative voting upon the question at a duly warned annual or special meeting to be held for that purpose. Prior to the meeting, the cooperative may provide to the voters an assessment of any risks and benefits of the proposed action.

In this section, “plant” and “renewable energy” have the same meaning as in section 8002 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 48

, § 4; amended

2015, No. 130

(Adj. Sess.), § 2.

§ 3045.
Conservation and load management.

Cooperatives may expend their funds, including the proceeds of their notes, bonds, or other obligations, for the purposes of modifying demand for electric capacity or energy through conservation or load management by participation in such facilities, projects, and programs as the governing board of the cooperative determines will effectively accomplish such purposes. Such facilities, projects, and programs may include providing or financing facilities or programs for conservation or load management, which may be: (i) owned or operated by the cooperative or by others, (ii) leased or licensed by the cooperative to others, or financed by loans by the cooperative to others, in either case on such terms and conditions as the governing board of the cooperative may determine.

A cooperative may issue its notes, bonds, or other obligations pursuant to any statutory authority conferring such power for carrying out the purposes of this section.

HISTORY:

Added

1989, No. 112

, § 5a, eff. June 22, 1989.

§ 3046.
[Reserved.]

§ 3047.
Cost allocations; subsidization prohibited.

In carrying out the purposes of this chapter, the electric revenues received from regulated activities of a cooperative shall not subsidize any nonelectric activities of the cooperative. A cooperative shall adopt cost allocation procedures to ensure that the electrical distribution revenues received from regulated activities of a cooperative do not subsidize any of the nonelectric activities and that costs attributable to any nonelectric activities are not included in the cooperative’s rates for electric service. A copy of the cost allocation procedures shall be available to the public upon request.

HISTORY:

Added

1999, No. 143

(Adj. Sess.), § 27; amended

2019, No. 79

, § 12, eff. June 20, 2019.